Hawaii, session 2026, HB2348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of land and natural resources has a variety of responsibilities related to operating, maintaining, and improving the State's parks through the state parks special fund.  The legislature further finds that funds from the state parks special fund are currently not authorized for environmental protection programs in state parks, despite these parks being vulnerable to visitor and climate impacts. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the department of land and natural resources to expend moneys from the state parks special fund for departmental programs aimed at environmental protection. SECTION 2.  Section 184-3.4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The department shall expend the moneys from the state parks special fund for the following purposes: (1)  Permanent and temporary staff positions; (2)  Planning and development of state parks programs, including the aina hoomalu state parks program; (3)  Construction, repairs, replacement, additions, and extensions of state parks facilities; (4)  Operation and maintenance costs of state parks and state parks programs; [and] (5)  Any departmental program aimed at environmental protection; and [(5)] (6)  Administrative costs of the division of state parks." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________